src/scripts/Russian/lseq.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define TranscribeLetterSequence 
а|a -> a0 || _ \.#. ,, 
а|a -> a1 || _ .#. ,, 
б|b -> b e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
б|b -> b e1 || _ .#. ,, 
в|v -> v e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
в|v -> v e1 || _ .#. ,, 
г|g -> g e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
г|g -> g e1 || _ .#. ,, 
д|d -> d e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
д|d -> d e1 || _ .#. ,, 
е|e -> j e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
е|e -> j e1 || _ .#. ,, 
ё -> j o1 || _ ,, 
ж -> zh e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
ж -> zh e1 || _ .#. ,, 
j -> j o1 t || _ ,, 
з|z -> z e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
з|z -> z e1 || _ .#. ,, 
и|i -> i0 || _ \.#. ,, 
и|i -> i1 || _ .#. ,, 
і -> i0 || _ \.#. ,,
і -> i1 || _ .#. ,,
й -> i0 k r a1 t k a0 j e0 || _ ,, 
к|k -> k a0 || _ \.#. ,, 
к|k -> k a1 || _ .#. ,, 
l|л -> e0 l || _ \.#. ,, 
l|л -> e1 l || \.#. _ .#. ,, 
l|л -> e1 ll || .#. _ .#. ,, 
m|м -> e0 m || _ \.#. ,, 
m|м -> e1 m || _ .#. ,, 
n|н -> e0 n || _ \.#. ,, 
n|н -> e1 n || _ .#. ,, 
о|o -> o1 || _ ,, 
п|p -> p e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
п|p -> p e1 || _ .#. ,, 
r|р -> e0 r || _ \.#. ,, 
r|р -> e1 r || _ .#. ,, 
s|с -> e0 s || _ \.#. ,, 
s|с -> e1 s || _ .#. ,, 
т|t -> t e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
т|t -> t e1 || _ .#. ,, 
у|u -> u0 || _ \.#. ,, 
у|u -> u1 || _ .#. ,, 
f|ф -> e0 f || _ \.#. ,, 
f|ф -> e1 f || _ .#. ,, 
х|h -> h a0 || _ \.#. ,, 
х|h -> h a1 || _ .#. ,, 
ц|c -> c e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
ц|c -> c e1 || _ .#. ,, 
ч -> ch e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
ч -> ch e1 || _ .#. ,, 
ш -> sh a0 || _ \.#. ,, 
ш -> sh a1 || _ .#. ,, 
щ -> sch a0 || _ \.#. ,, 
щ -> sch a1 || _ .#. ,, 
ь -> mm a1 h kk i0 j z n a1 k || .#. _ .#. ,, 
ы -> y0 || _ \.#. ,, 
ы -> y1 || _ .#. ,, 
ъ -> t vv o1 r d y0 j z n a1 k || .#. _ .#. ,,
ѣ -> j e0 rr || _ ,,
э -> e0 || _ \.#. ,, 
э -> e1 || _ .#. ,, 
ю -> j u0 || _ \.#. ,, 
ю -> j u1 || _ .#. ,, 
я -> j a0 || _ \.#. ,, 
я -> j a1 || _ .#. ,,
ѳ -> e0 f || _ \.#. ,,
ѳ -> e1 f || _ .#. ,,
ѵ -> i0 || _ \.#. ,,
ѵ -> i1 || _ .#. ,,
q -> k u0 || _ \.#. ,, 
q -> k u1 || _ .#. ,, 
w -> d u0 b ll v e1 || _ ,,
x -> i0 k s || _ \.#. ,, 
x -> i1 k s || _ .#. ,, 
y -> i1 g rr i0 k || _ ; 

regex 
TranscribeLetterSequence ; 
